Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1554
General Power for Real Estate, defined.

The short form expression, General Power for Real Estate, shall mean that the principal, in connection with and with respect to ownership or possession of any claim to, estate in, or interest in any real estate or other realty, whether or not any of them is specifically described or named, generally authorizes and empowers the agent to have and to exercise collectively or singly and concurrently or consecutively any one or more in combination or otherwise of each of Specific Authority for Acquisitions, Specific Authority for Ancillary Matters, Specific Authority for Assistants, Specific Authority for Claims, Specific Authority for Compensation, Specific Authority for Contracts, Specific Authority for Disclosure, Names, and Signatures, Specific Authority for Dispositions, Specific Authority for Documents, Specific Authority for Encumbrances, Specific Authority for Improvements, Specific Authority for Insolvency Proceedings, Specific Authority for Investments, Specific Authority for Maintenance, Specific Authority for Proceeds, Specific Authority for Reimbursements, Specific Authority for Reorganizations, Specific Authority for Reports, Specific Authority for Taxes, and Specific Authority for Trusts, and that the principal also generally authorizes and empowers the agent to allow, permit, or require any person or persons by contract, covenant, deed, easement, lease, license, or any other oral or written arrangement to abandon, demolish, develop, exploit, improve, manage, mine, sublease, or make or refrain from any other use of any property, to abandon, alter, erect, demolish, install, lease, manage, modify, remove, repair, or replace any fixture or structure upon or other elements or improvements on any property, to appropriate, divert, drill, explore for, extract, lease, mine, pump, or remove any gas, gravel, metal, oil, ore, sand, water, or other component part, deposit, mineral, or other material in, on, over, or under any property, to develop, divide, fill, grade, landscape, lease, manage, regrade, sell, or subdivide any property, to make any commercial, private, or other use of any property, to modify the appearance or topology of any property, and otherwise generally to act or decide as to any real property or related circumstance, condition, interest, matter, property, question, or transaction as the principal might do or omit to do in person and while competent.

Laws 1988, LB 475, § 54.